North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-02.1 Flood Control or Reduction Projects

61-02.1-01.
Legislative findings and intent — Authority to issue bonds.

The legislative assembly finds that some cities suffered serious economic and social injuries due to the major flood disaster in 1997 and other recent floods and are at significant risk for future flooding; that construction of flood control or reduction projects is necessary for the protection of health, property, and enterprises and for the promotion of prosperity and the general welfare of the people of the state; and that construction of any such projects involves and requires the exercise of the sovereign powers of the state and concerns a public purpose. It is necessary and in the public interest the state by and through the state water commission assist in financing the costs of constructing flood control or reduction projects through the issuance of bonds.

The legislative assembly finds continued construction of the southwest pipeline project is necessary for the protection of health, property, and enterprises and for the promotion of prosperity and the general welfare of the people of the state, involves and requires the exercise of the sovereign powers of the state, and concerns a public purpose. The legislative assembly also finds current funding for the southwest pipeline project has become uncertain, and it is necessary and in the public interest the state by and through the state water commission assist in financing the costs of continued construction of the southwest pipeline project through the issuance of bonds.

The legislative assembly finds the Devils Lake basin is suffering and facing a worsening flood disaster; construction of an outlet from Devils Lake is necessary for the protection of health, property, and enterprises and for the promotion of prosperity and the general welfare of the people of the state; and construction of the outlet involves and requires the exercise of the sovereign powers of the state and concerns a public purpose. It is necessary and in the public interest an outlet from Devils Lake be constructed with financing from the state water commission to provide flood relief to the Devils Lake basin.

The legislative assembly finds there is a critical need to develop a comprehensive statewide water development program to serve the long-term water resource needs of the state and its people and to protect the state’s current usage of, and the state’s claim to, its proper share of Missouri River water.

In furtherance of the public purpose set forth in subsection 1, the state water commission may issue bonds under chapter 61-02, and the proceeds are appropriated for flood control projects authorized and funded in part by the federal government and designed to provide permanent flood control or reduction to cities that suffered severe damages as a result of the 1997 flood or other recent floods and to repay the line of credit extended to the state water commission under S.L. 1999, ch. 535, § 4. The commission may issue bonds for a flood control or reduction project only:

When:

A flood control or reduction project involves a city that suffered catastrophic flood damage requiring evacuation of the major share of its populace;

A flood control or reduction project includes interstate features and requires acquisition of private property to build permanent flood protection systems to comply with federal flood protection standards;

The governing body of a city provides a written certification to the state water commission that the city has committed itself to contribute one-half or more of the North Dakota project sponsor’s share of the nonfederal share of the cost to construct the project;

The United States army corps of engineers issues its approval of the flood control or reduction project;

A project cooperation agreement, which contains provisions acceptable to the department of water resources and is approved by the governor, is entered by the state of Minnesota or one of its political subdivisions in which the flood control or reduction project is to be constructed;

A project cooperation agreement, which contains provisions acceptable to the department of water resources and is approved by the governor, is entered by the state or one of its political subdivisions in which the flood control or reduction project is to be constructed;

The governing body of the city has approved a financing plan for all amounts of the nonfederal share of a flood control or reduction project in excess of the amounts to be paid by the state; and

The flood control or reduction project is designed to be cost-effective, and any impact on residential neighborhoods is minimized in an amount reasonably practicable as determined by the department of water resources and approved by the governor;

When a flood control or reduction project in a city with a population as of the 1990 federal decennial census of at least eight thousand and not more than ten thousand has received significant federal funding through federal grants and funds from the United States army corps of engineers and the federal emergency management agency; or

When a flood control or reduction project in a city with a population as of the 1990 federal decennial census of at least four thousand five hundred and not more than six thousand has at least seventy percent of the land within the boundaries of the city located within the one hundred year floodplain as designated on a flood insurance rate map and the United States army corps of engineers issues its approval of the flood control or reduction project.

In furtherance of the public purpose set forth in subsection 2, the state water commission may issue bonds under chapter 61-02, and the proceeds are appropriated for construction of the southwest pipeline project and to repay the line of credit extended to the state water commission under S.L. 1999, ch. 535, § 4. The commission may issue bonds under this chapter for continued construction of the southwest pipeline project only when it is determined the Perkins County water system will not make payment to the state water commission in the amount of four million five hundred thousand dollars or on January 1, 2000, whichever occurs earlier. If the Perkins County water system makes payment to the state water commission after January 1, 2000, the payment must be used to pay principal and interest on bonds issued for continued construction of the southwest pipeline project as provided in subsection 2 of section 61-02.1-04. If the Perkins County water system does not make payment to the state water commission, no benefits may accrue to the Perkins County water system.

In furtherance of the public purposes set forth in subsections 3 and 4, the state water commission may issue bonds under chapter 61-02 to finance the cost of one or more of the projects identified in this section.

This chapter does not affect the state water commission’s authority to otherwise issue bonds pursuant to chapter 61-02 or section 61-24.3-01.

Notwithstanding this section, the state water commission may not issue bonds authorized under subsection 5 for a project unless federal funds have been appropriated for that project.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 535, § 3; 2001, ch. 562, § 3; 2005, ch. 591, § 2; 2021, ch. 488, § 41, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 1 of chapter 549, S.L. 2003, provides:

“

AMENDMENT.

Section 11 of chapter 535, S.L. 1999, as amended by section 1 of chapter 559, S.L. 2001 is amended and reenacted as follows:

“

SECTION 11. EXPIRATION DATE.

Except for the issuance of bonds for construction of an outlet from Devils Lake, the authority of the commission to issue bonds as provided in chapter 61-02.1 is effective through June 30, 2001, and after that date is ineffective. The authority of the commission to issue bonds as provided in chapter 61-02.1 for construction of an outlet from Devils Lake is effective through June 30, 2005, and after that date is ineffective. However, the commission may continue to exercise all other powers granted to it under this Act and to comply with any covenants entered into pursuant to this Act.”

61-02.1-02.
Bond issuance amount limited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 591, § 4.

61-02.1-02.1.
Funding — Statewide water development projects — Bond issuance amount.

The priorities for the statewide water development program include municipal, rural, and industrial projects; irrigation projects; general water management projects, including rural flood control, snagging and clearing, channel improvement, recreation, and planning studies; flood control projects; and weather modification projects, which are authorized and declared to be in the public interest. The state water commission may provide the funds necessary to construct these projects from money appropriated to the state water commission from the resources trust fund or by issuing bonds in an amount not to exceed sixty million dollars plus the costs of issuance of the bonds, capitalized interest, and reasonably required reserves. The proceeds of any bonds issued under the authority provided in this section are appropriated to the state water commission for the purposes set forth in this section.

If the state water commission determines it is appropriate to do so, it may, in lieu of issuing or in combination with the issuance of bonds pursuant to this section or section 61-02.1-01, for all or part of the state’s cost share for the projects set forth in those provisions, use funds appropriated to it from the resources trust fund.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 22, § 14; 2003, ch. 43, § 13; 2005, ch. 591, § 3; 2021, ch. 32, § 10, effective July 1, 2021.

61-02.1-03.
Limitation of action.

An action may not be brought or maintained in any court in this state questioning the validity of any bonds issued as provided in this chapter unless the action is commenced within thirty days after the adoption of the resolution of the state water commission authorizing the sale of the bonds. The state water commission may commence a special proceeding anytime after April 19, 1999, in and by which the constitutionality and validity of the bonds to be issued pursuant to this chapter may be judicially examined, approved and confirmed, or disapproved and disaffirmed. Proceedings must comply as nearly as possible with the procedure required for declaratory judgment proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 535, § 3.

61-02.1-04.
Bonds payable from appropriations and other revenues.

Principal and interest on bonds issued for flood control or reduction projects as provided in this chapter are payable from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the resources trust fund other than revenues from state taxes, then from appropriations of other available revenues in the then current biennium, and then from any other revenues the state water commission makes available during the then current biennium for that purpose, including any federal moneys received by the state for the construction of flood control or reduction projects to pay bonds issued for that project. If sufficient funds from these sources are not available, then from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the first available current biennial earnings of the Bank of North Dakota not to exceed six million five hundred thousand dollars per biennium prorated with any other bonds payable from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the available current biennial earnings of the Bank of North Dakota, to be credited by the trustee to the fund established for paying principal and interest on the bonds under a trust indenture.

Principal and interest on bonds issued for continued construction of the southwest pipeline project are payable from the resources trust fund other than revenues from state taxes, then from appropriations of other available revenues in the then current biennium, or from payment from the Perkins County rural water system, and then from any other revenues the state water commission makes available during the then current biennium for that purpose, including any federal moneys received by the state for the construction of the southwest pipeline project to pay bonds issued for the project. If sufficient funds from these sources are not available, then from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the first available current biennial earnings of the Bank of North Dakota not to exceed six million five hundred thousand dollars per biennium prorated with any other bonds payable from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the available current biennial earnings of the Bank of North Dakota, to be credited by the trustee to the fund established for paying principal and interest on the bonds under a trust indenture.

Principal and interest on bonds issued under subsection 7 of section 61-02.1-01 are payable from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the resources trust fund other than revenues from state taxes, then from appropriations of other available revenues in the then current biennium, and then from any other revenues the state water commission makes available during the then current biennium for that purpose, including any federal moneys received by the state for the construction of an outlet to Devils Lake to pay bonds issued for that project, or financing a statewide water development program to pay bonds issued for that project. If sufficient funds from these sources are not available, then from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the first available current biennial earnings of the Bank of North Dakota not to exceed six million five hundred thousand dollars per biennium prorated with any other bonds payable from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the available current biennial earnings of the Bank of North Dakota, to be credited by the trustee to the fund established for paying principal and interest on the bonds under a trust indenture.

Obligations issued as provided in this chapter do not constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of the state of North Dakota or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state of North Dakota, but are payable solely from the sources as described in this chapter.

The state water commission shall include in its submission to the governor for inclusion by the governor in the biennial executive budget of the state for each year of the respective biennium during the term of any bonds issued as provided in this chapter an amount fully sufficient to pay the principal and interest required to be paid in each year of the biennium, if any, from moneys from non-general fund sources. Provided, that should the governor not include in the executive budget for any reason the amounts required to be included by this section, the state water commission shall request independently that the legislative assembly amend the executive budget appropriation so as to include the amounts.

Principal and interest on bonds issued for projects authorized pursuant to section 61-02.1-02.1 are payable from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the resources trust fund other than revenues from state taxes, then from appropriations of other available revenues in the then current biennium, and then from any other revenues the state water commission makes available during the then current biennium for that purpose. If sufficient funds from these sources are not available, then from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the first available current biennial earnings of the Bank of North Dakota not to exceed six million five hundred thousand dollars per biennium prorated with any other bonds payable from transfers to be made and appropriated by the legislative assembly from the available current biennial earnings of the Bank of North Dakota, to be credited by the trustee to the fund established for paying principal and interest on the bonds under a trust indenture.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 535, § 3; 2001, ch. 22, § 15; 2021, ch. 32, § 11, effective July 1, 2021.

61-02.1-05.
Water development trust fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 535, § 3; 2007, ch. 559, § 6; repealed by 2021, ch. 32, § 13, effective July 1, 2021.

61-02.1-06.
Grand Forks flood control project.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or policy, any existing caps may not be construed to limit access to total state funding of up to fifty-two million dollars for the Grand Forks flood control project.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 46, § 9.